Alaska statutes. Title 33. Probation, Prisons, Pardons, and Prisoners.
Article 4. General Provisions.

Sec. 33.30.901.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise,

“center” means a correctional restitution center;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of corrections;

“community service” means work on projects designed to reduce or eliminate environmental damage, protect the public health, or improve public services, lands, forests, parks, roads, highways, facilities, or education; community service may not confer a private benefit on a person except as may be incidental to the public benefit;

“correctional facility” or “facility” means a prison, jail, camp, farm, half-way house, group home, or other placement designated by the commissioner for the custody, care, and discipline of prisoners; a “state correctional facility” means a correctional facility owned or run by the state;

“court” means the supreme court, the court of appeals, the superior court, the district or magistrate court, or a justice or judge of a court;

“crime against a person” means a crime as set out in AS 11.41, or a crime against a person in this or another jurisdiction having elements substantially identical to those of a crime as set out in AS 11.41;

“crime involving domestic violence” has the meaning given in AS

18.66.990

;

“department” means the Department of Corrections;

“furlough” means an authorized leave of absence from actual confinement for a designated purpose and period of time;

“health care provider” means

a physician assistant licensed to practice in the state and working under the direct supervision of a licensed physician or psychiatrist;

a mental health professional as defined in AS

47.30.915

; or

an advanced practice registered nurse as defined in AS

08.68.850

;

“municipality” means a municipality authorized by law to establish a correctional facility;

“prisoner”

means a person held under authority of state law in official detention as defined in AS

11.81.900(b)

;

includes a minor committed to the custody of the commissioner when,

under AS

47.12.030

,

47.12.065

, or

47.12.100

, the minor has been charged, prosecuted, or convicted as an adult; or

under AS

47.12.160(e)

, the minor has been ordered transferred to the custody of the commissioner;

“sex offender or child kidnapper,” “sex offense,” and “child kidnapping” have the meanings given in AS

12.63.100

;

“temporary commitment” means detention of a person for any period under authority of state law, but does not include confinement upon conviction and judgment of a court of this state;

“victim” has the meaning given in AS

12.55.185

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986; am § 23 ch 59 SLA 1989; am § 9 ch 41 SLA 1994; am § 4 ch 113 SLA 1994; am § 62 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 23 ch 106 SLA 1998; am § 5 ch 107 SLA 1998; am § 47 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (13) was enacted as (14). Renumbered as (12) in 1994, at which time former (12) and (13) were renumbered as (13) and (14) respectively. Paragraph (7) was enacted as (15). Renumbered in 1996, at which time former paragraphs (7) — (14) were renumbered as (8) — (15).

In 2001, in the definition of “health care provider,” “physician assistant” was substituted for “physician’s assistant” to correct a manifest error.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (10)(A), deleted “or nurse practitioner” following “a physician assistant”; added (10)(C); and made related changes.